Massachusetts, session 194th, H1952.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 239 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following sections: 
Section 16. 
For purposes of sections 17 and 18 the following terms shall have the following 
meanings: 
“Advisory committee”, the committee established pursuant to section 18(g). 
“Covered proceeding”, an action brought pursuant to chapter 239, chapter 139 section 19, 
or similar proceedings, including administrative proceedings to terminate a mobile or project-
based housing subsidy or public housing tenancy. 

of 6 10  “Designated organization”, a not-for-profit organization that is designated by the 
Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation to contract to provide civil legal assistance and to 
conduct tenant outreach, engagement and education for eligible individuals. 
"Eligible individual”, a party in a covered proceeding who is an indigent: (i) tenant or 
occupant of any premises rented or leased for dwelling purposes; or (ii) owner-occupant of a 1-
to-3-family dwelling that is their sole dwelling and located in the Commonwealth. 
“Full legal representation”, ongoing legal representation provided by legal counsel in a 
designated organization to an eligible individual including all legal advice, advocacy, and 
assistance associated with representation. Full representation includes, but is not limited to, the 
filing of a notice of appearance on behalf of the eligible individual in a covered proceeding. 
“Indigent”, a person who is: (i) receiving public assistance pursuant to: (1) aid to families 
with dependent children pursuant to chapter 118; (2) the emergency aid program for elderly and 
disabled residents pursuant to section 1 of chapter 117A; (3) a veterans’ benefits program; (4) 
Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act; (5) the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, 
pursuant to 7 U.S.C. chapter 51; (6) refugee resettlement benefits; or (7) Medicaid, pursuant to 
42 U.S.C. section 1396, et seq.; or (ii) earning an income, after taxes, that is 80 per cent or less of 
the current area median income established annually by the United States Department of 
Housing and Urban Development; or (iii) unable to pay the fees and costs of the covered 
proceeding in which the person is a party or is unable to do so without depriving said person or 
said person’s dependents of the necessities of life, including food, shelter and clothing. 
“Legal counsel” or “counsel”, lawyer licensed to practice law in the Commonwealth. 

of 6 31  “Partner attorney”, an attorney employed by or affiliated with a designated organization 
who agrees to provide full legal representation pursuant to this act. 
“Access to Counsel Program”, a statewide access to counsel program to provide full legal 
representation to eligible individuals in covered proceedings to be funded by a specifically 
dedicated general court appropriation. 
Section 17. 
(a) There shall be a statewide Access to Counsel Program in eviction cases to effectuate 
the purposes of this act, subject to appropriation, to be specifically funded by the general court 
and administered by the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation. 
(b) With specifically designated funding, the Massachusetts Legal Assistance 
Corporation shall establish an Access to Counsel Program to provide free legal assistance and 
full representation to eligible individuals in covered proceedings. 
(c) The Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation shall issue a request for proposal 
through a public notice for organizations to submit proposals to become designated 
organizations. The notice must delineate an open and transparent process for approving requests 
with input from the advisory committee. All organizations seeking to become designated 
organizations shall have the right to apply for funding and must identify the geographic area in 
which they shall represent eligible individuals. A designated organization may contract with 
partner attorneys to provide legal assistance and with community organizations to educate and 
inform tenants about their rights. Such information shall be available in multiple languages to 
ensure equitable access for linguistic minorities. 

of 6 52  (d) Designated Organizations shall: (i) have substantial expertise in housing law and  
landlord and tenant law and substantial experience furnishing free legal assistance to eligible 
individuals; (ii) have a demonstrated track record of serving the low-income community, (ii) 
identify the geographic area in which they shall provide legal representation; (iii) have a plan to 
reach and provide legal representation to income eligible persons with limited English 
proficiency; (iv) provide appropriate supervision and training; (v) incorporate paralegals, legal 
interns or law students, where possible, to be supervised by legal counsel; and (vi) satisfy other 
criteria established the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation with input from the advisory 
committee. Nothing herein shall interfere with any legal counsel carrying out their professional 
responsibilities to their clients as established in the canons of ethics and the code of professional 
responsibility adopted by the supreme judicial court. 
(e) The Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation shall issue a request for proposal for 
qualified legal aid organizations to coordinate representation of eligible tenants statewide and a 
request for proposal for a qualified legal aid organization to coordinate representation of eligible 
owner-occupants. Such organizations shall provide statewide programmatic support and 
programmatic advocacy in addition to convening statewide trainings and forums for cross-
training of attorneys in order to effectuate the purpose of this act. 
(f) The Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation shall be responsible for exercising 
oversight, implementing fiscal controls, and for all data collection, deliverables, and ongoing 
programmatic evaluation. 
(g) The Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation shall appoint an advisory committee 
with fifteen members from diverse regions of the Commonwealth that includes, but is not limited 

of 6 74 to, low-income tenants, low-income owner-occupants, non-profit community-based 
organizations, statewide advocacy organizations, and municipal officials. Each member shall 
have a 
demonstrated commitment to homelessness prevention and housing stability. The 
advisory committee shall advise on matters and policies affecting the Access to Counsel Program 
and shall be convened by the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation on a regular basis, but 
no less than twice a year. 
(h) The Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation, in consultation with the advisory 
committee and designated organizations, shall determine how to phase in the access to counsel 
program over a period of 5 years. 
Section 18. 
(a) The Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation shall submit, with input from the 
advisory committee, a form to be approved by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial Court 
that shall be used to notify individuals of their potential eligibility for access to legal counsel in 
covered proceedings and to the availability of housing stability resources and rental assistance 
programs. The supreme judicial court shall consider adopting other forms recommended by the 
Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation, with input from the advisory committee, as needed. 
(b) Lessors must include or attach the form approved by the supreme judicial court to the 
notice to quit and summons and complaint for covered proceedings. The trial court shall notify 
lessors about the required form and lessors’ potential eligibility for legal counsel pursuant to this 
act. The form must be posted on the trial court’s website. 

of 6 95  (c) If an eligible tenant, occupant or owner-occupant did not receive the approved form 
required pursuant to this section or legal counsel does not have sufficient time to file responsive 
pleadings, there shall be a reasonable continuation of the proceedings so that the tenant, occupant 
or owner-occupant can obtain legal assistance to prepare their case. 
(d) The supreme judicial court shall approve a written waiver form for the trial court to 
100 inform eligible individuals about access to legal counsel in court proceedings in order for eligible 
101 individuals to knowingly and voluntarily waive the provisions of this act. 
102  SECTION 2. The general court shall, subject to appropriation, fund an Access to Counsel 
103 Program in the Judiciary section of the budget through a specifically dedicated line-item to be 
104 administered by the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation to effectuate the purposes of 
105 this act. 
106  SECTION 3. The provisions of this act, unless otherwise expressly provided, shall take 
107 effect immediately upon passage.